K 
2 

^ DO 



OU164192 



00 



OSMAiyiA UNIVERSITY LIBRARY 

Call No./ J-f , &t/ $"?/ Accession No. 2L/ 

Author AwMSjCjtA4f, J SV . 

Title /^ttf^^W i^ f\&L4*&*L / 

This book should be returned on or before the date last marked below. 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 



LONDON: HUMPHREY MILFORD 
OXFORD UNIVERSITY PRESS 



THE 
FUNCTION OF REASON 



BY 
ALFRED NORTH WHITEHEAD, Sc.D., LL.D., F.R.S. 

Fellow of Trinity College in the University of Cambridge 

and Professor of Philosophy 

in Harvard University 



LOUIS CLARK VANUXEM 

FOUNDATION LECTURES 

DELIVERED AT PRINCETON UNIVERSITY, 

MARCH 1929 



PRINCETON 

PRINCETON UNIVERSITY PRESS 
1929 



COPYRIGHT, 1929, BY PRINCETON UNIVERSITY PRESS 



PRINTED AT THE PRINCETON UNIVERSITY PRESS 
PRINCETON NEW JERSEY U. 8, A. 



INTRODUCTORY SUMMARY 

HISTORY discloses two main tendencies in 
the course of events. One tendency is ex- 
emplified in the slow decay of physical 
nature. With stealthy inevitableness, there is degra- 
dation of energy. The sources of activity sink down- 
ward and downward. Their very matter wastes. 
The other tendency is exemplified by the yearly 
renewal of nature in the spring, and by the upward 
course of biological evolution. In these pages I con- 
sider Reason in its relation to these contrasted 
aspects of history. Reason is the self -discipline of 
the originative element in history. Apart from the 
operations of Reason, this element is anarchic. 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

CHAPTER I 



r "tHE topic here considered The Function of 

I Reason is one of the oldest topics for phil- 
~JL osophical discussion. What is the function 
of Reason amid the welter of our mental experi- 
ences, amid our intuitions, our emotions, our pur- 
poses, our decisions of emphasis ? In order to answer 
such a question we have to consider the nature of 
Reason, its essence. Of course this is a hackneyed 
theme. Its discussion stretches back to the very 
beginnings of philosophic thought. But it is the busi- 
ness of philosophers to discuss such fundamental 
topics, and to set them on the stage illuminated by 
our modern ways of thinking. 

Various phrases suggest themselves, which recall 
the special controversies depending upon the de- 
termination of the true function of Reason : 

Faith and Reason: Reason and Authority: 
Reason and Intuition: Criticism and Imagination: 
Reason, Agency, Purpose: Scientific Methodology: 
Philosophy and the Sciences: Rationalism, Scep- 
ticism, Dogmatism: Reason and Empiricism: Prag- 
matism. 

Each of these phrases suggests the scope of 
Reason, and the limitation of that scope. Also the 
variety of topics included in them shows that we 



2 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

shall not exhaust our subject by the help of a neat 
little verbal phrase. 

Yet, in despite of this warning to avoid a mere 
phrase, I will start with a preliminary definition of 
the function of Reason, a definition to be illustrated, 
distorted, and enlarged, as this discussion proceeds. 

The function of Reason is to promote the art of 
life. 

In the interpretation of this definition, I must at 
once join issue with the evolutionist fallacy sug- 
gested by the phrase "the survival of the fittest." 
The fallacy does not consist in believing that in the 
struggle for existence the fittest to survive eliminate 
the less fit. The fact is obvious and stares us in the 
face. The fallacy is the belief that fitness for sur- 
vival is identical with the best exemplification of the 
Art of Life. 

In fact life itself is comparatively deficient in 
survival value. The art of persistence is to be dead. 
Only inorganic things persist for great lengths of 
time. A rock survives for eight hundred million 
years ; whereas the limit for a tree is about a thou- 
sand years, for a man or an elephant about fifty or 
one hundred years, for a dog about twelve years, for 
an insect about one year. The problem set by the 
doctrine of evolution is to explain how complex or- 
ganisms with such deficient survival power ever 
evolved. They certainly did not appear because they 
were better at that game than the rocks around 
them. It may be possible to explain "the origin of 
species" by the doctrine of the struggle for exist- 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 3 

ence among such organisms. But certainly this 
struggle throws no light whatever upon the emer- 
gence of such a general type of complex organism, 
with faint survival power. This problem is not to be 
solved by any dogma, which is the product of mere 
abstract thought elaborating its notions of the fit- 
ness of things. The solution requires that thought 
pay full attention to the empirical evidence, and to 
the whole of that evidence. 

The range of species of living things is very large. 
It stretches from mankind throughout all the verte- 
brates, and the insects, and the barely organized 
animals which seem like societies of cells, and 
throughout the varieties of vegetable life, and down 
to the minutest microscopic forms of life. At the 
lower end of the scale, it is hazardous to draw any 
sharp distinction between living things and inor- 
ganic matter. There are two ways of surveying this 
range of species. One way abstracts from time, and 
considers the variety of species as illustrating vari- 
ous levels of life. The other way emphasizes time, 
by considering the genetic relations of the species 
one to another. 

The latter way embraces the doctrine of evolu- 
tion, and interprets the vanishing of species and of 
sporadically variant individuals, as being due to 
maladjustment to the environment. This explana- 
tion has its measure of truth : it is one of the great 
generalizations of science. But enthusiasts have so 
strained its interpretation as to make it explain 
nothing, by reason of the fact that it explains every- 



4 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

thing. We hardly ever know the definite character 
of the struggle which occasioned the disappearance. 
The phrase is like the liturgical refrain of a litany, 
chanted over the fossils of vanished species. If the 
mere fact of dying out be sufficient proof of mal- 
adjustment to the environment, the explanation is 
reduced to a tautology. The importance of the doc- 
trine of the struggle for existence depends on the 
assumption that living beings reproduce themselves 
in sufficient numbers of healthy offspring, and that 
adaptation to the environment is therefore the only 
decisive factor. This double assumption of prolific- 
ness and of healthiness is obviously not always true 
in particular instances. There are limitations to the 
doctrine of Malthus. 

But there is another factor in evolution which is 
not in the least explained by the doctrine of the 
survival of the fittest. Why has the trend of evolu- 
tion been upwards? The fact that organic species 
have been produced from inorganic distributions of 
matter, and the fact that in the lapse of time organic 
species of higher and higher types have evolved are 
not in the least explained by any doctrine of adapta- 
tion to the environment, or of struggle. 

In fact the upward trend has been accompanied 
by a growth of the converse relation. Animals have 
progressively undertaken the task of adapting the 
environment to themselves. They have built nests, 
and social dwelling-places of great complexity; 
beavers have cut down trees and dammed rivers; 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 5 

insects have elaborated a high community life with 
a variety of reactions upon the environment. 

Even the more intimate actions of animals are 
activities modifying the environment. The simplest 
living things let their food swim into them. The 
higher animals chase their food, catch it, and masti- 
cate it. In so acting, they are transforming the en- 
vironment for their own purposes. Some animals 
dig for their food, others stalk their prey. Of course 
all these operations are meant by the common 
doctrine of adaptation to the environment. But they 
are very inadequately expressed by that statement ; 
and the real facts easily drop out of sight under 
cover of that statement. The higher forms of life are 
actively engaged in modifying their environment. 
In the case of mankind this active attack on the en- 
vironment is the most prominent fact in his existence. 

I now state the thesis that the explanation of this 
active attack on the environment is a three-fold 
urge: (i) to live, (ii) to live well, (iii) to live better. 
In fact the art of life is first to be alive, secondly to 
be alive in a satisfactory way, and thirdly to acquire 
an increase in satisfaction. It is at this point of our 
argument that we have to recur to the function of 
Reason, namely the promotion of the art of life. 
The primary function of Reason is the direction of 
the attack on the environment. 

This conclusion amounts to the thesis that Reason 
is a factor in experience which directs and criticizes 
the urge towards the attainment of an end realized 
in imagination but not in fact. 



6 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

From the point of view of prevalent physiological 
doctrine this thesis is a complete heresy. To the older 
discussions mentioned earlier Faith and Reason, 
Reason and Authority, and so on I should have 
added one other, Physiology and Final Causation, 
When we have added that item, we have placed the 
discussion of Reason in its modern setting. 

In fact we have now before us the two contrasted 
ways of considering Reason. We can think of it as 
one among the operations involved in the existence 
of an animal body, and we can think of it in ab- 
straction from any particular animal operations. In 
this latter mode of consideration, Reason is the 
operation of theoretical realization. In theoretical 
realization the Universe, or at least factors in it, 
are understood in their character of exemplifying a 
theoretical system. Reason realizes the possibility of 
some complex form of definiteness, and concur- 
rently understands the world as, in one of its fac- 
tors, exemplifying that form of definiteness. 

The older controversies have mainly to do with 
this latter mode of considering Reason. For them, 
Reason is the godlike faculty which surveys, judges 
and understands. In the newer controversy Reason 
is one of the items of operation implicated in the 
welter of the process. It is obvious that the two 
points of view must be brought together, if the 
theoretical Reason is to be satisfied as to its own 
status. But much confusion is occasioned by in- 
consistently wavering between the two standpoints 
without any coordination of them. There is Reason, 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 7 

asserting itself as above the world, and there is 
Reason as one of many factors within the world. 
The Greeks have bequeathed to us two figures, 
whose real or mythical lives conform to these two 
notions Plato and Ulysses. The one shares Reason 
with the Gods, the other shares it with the foxes, 

We can combine the discussion of these two 
aspects of Reason by considering the relevance of 
the notion of final causation to the behavior of 
animal bodies. We shall then see how the theoretical 
and practical Reason in fact operate in the minds 
of men. 

Those physiologists who voice the common opin- 
ion of their laboratories, tell us with practical 
unanimity that no consideration of final causes 
should be allowed to intrude into the science of 
physiology. In this respect physiologists are at one 
with Francis Bacon at the beginning of the scien- 
tific epoch, and also with the practice of all the 
natural sciences. 

In this rejection of final causation the testimony 
seems overwhelming, until we remember that it is 
testimony of exactly the same force and character 
as that which led the educated section of the classi- 
cal world to reject the Christian outlook, and as 
that which led the educated scholastic world to re- 
ject the novel scientific outlook of the sixteenth 
and seventeenth centuries. We have got to remem- 
ber the two aspects of Reason, the Reason of Plato 
and the Reason of Ulysses, Reason as seeking a 



8 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

complete understanding and Reason as seeking an 
immediate method of action. 

As a question of scientific methodology there 
can be no doubt that the scientists have been right. 
But we have to discriminate between the weight to 
be given to scientific opinion in the selection of its 
methods, and its trustworthiness in formulating 
judgments of the understanding. The slightest 
scrutiny of the history of natural science shows that 
current scientific opinion is nearly infallible in the 
former case, and is invariably wrong in the latter 
case. The man with a method good for purposes 
of his dominant interests, is a pathological case in 
respect to his wider judgment on the coordination 
of this method with a more complete experience. 
Priests and scientists, statesmen and men of business, 
philosophers and mathematicians, are all alike in 
this respect. We all start by being empiricists. But 
our empiricism is confined within our immediate in- 
terests. The more clearly we grasp the intellectual 
analysis of a way regulating procedure for the sake 
of those interests, the more decidedly we reject the 
inclusion of evidence which refuses to be im- 
mediately harmonized with the method before us. 
Some of the major disasters of mankind have been 
produced by the narrowness of men with a good 
methodology. Ulysses has no use for Plato, and 
the bones of his companions are strewn on many a 
reef and many an isle. 

The particular doctrine in question is, that in 
the transformations of matter and energy which 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 9 

constitute the activities of an animal body no 
principles can be discerned other than those which 
govern the activities of inorganic matter. There can 
be no dispute as to the main physiological facts. No 
reactions between the material components of an 
animal body have been observed which in any way 
infringe the physical and chemical laws applying 
to the behavior of inorganic material. But this is a 
very different proposition from the doctrine that 
no additional principles can be involved. The two 
propositions are only identical on the supposition 
that the sort of physical principles involved are 
sufficient to determine definitely the particular ac- 
tivities of each physical body. 

This is certainly not the case if we refer to 
principles such as the conservation of energy, and 
the chemical reactions. It is often assumed that 
even the one law of the conservation of energy 
determines without ambiguity the activities to which 
it applies. It is difficult to understand how such a 
baseless fiction could have arisen. 

But the point to which I wish to draw attention 
is the mass of evidence lying outside the physio- 
logical method which is simply ignored in the 
prevalent scientific doctrine. The conduct of human 
affairs is entirely dominated by our recognition of 
foresight determining purpose, and purpose issu- 
ing in conduct. Almost every sentence we utter and 
every judgment we form, presuppose our unfailing 
experience of this element in life. The evidence is 
so overwhelming, the belief so unquestioning, the 



10 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

evidence of language so decisive, that it is difficult 
to know where to begin in demonstrating it. For 
example, we speak of the policy of a statesman or 
of a business corporation. Cut out the notion of 
final causation, and the word "policy" has lost its 
meaning. As I write this lecture, I intend to de- 
liver it in Princeton University. Cut out the notion 
of final causation, and this "intention" is without 
meaning. Again consider the voyage of the battleship 
Utah round the South American continent. Con- 
sider first the ship itself. We are asked to believe 
that the concourse of atoms, of iron, and of nitro- 
gen, and of other sorts of chemical elements, into 
the form of the ship, of its armour, of its guns, of 
its engines, of its ammunition, of its stores of food, 
that this concourse was purely the outcome of the 
same physical laws by which the ocean waves aim- 
lessly beat on the coasts of Maine. There could be 
no more aim in one episode than in the other. The 
activity of the shipbuilders was merely analogous 
to the rolling of the shingle on the beach. 

Pass on now to consider still presupposing the 
orthodox physiological doctrine the voyage of the 
ship. The President-elect of the United States had 
nothing to do with it. His intentions with respect 
to South American policy and goodwill in the world 
were beside the question, being futile irrelevancies. 
The motions of his body, those of the bodies of the 
sailors, like the motions of the ship-builders, were 
purely governed by the physical laws which lead a 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 11 

stone to roll down a slope and water to boil. The 
very idea is ridiculous. 

We shall of course be told that the doctrine is not 
meant to apply to the conduct of men. Yet the 
bodily motions are physiological operations. If 
these latter be blind, so are the motions. Also men 
are animals. Surely, the whole fight over evolution 
was about this very latter point. 

Again we are told that we should look at the 
matter historically. Mankind has gradually de- 
veloped from the lowliest forms of life, and must 
therefore be explained in terms applicable to all 
such forms. But why construe the later forms by 
analogy to the earlier forms. Why not reverse the 
process? It would seem to be more sensible, more 
truly empirical, to allow each living species to make 
its own contribution to the demonstration of factors 
inherent in living things. 

I need not continue the discussion. The case is 
too clear for elaboration. Yet the trained body of 
physiologists under the influence of the ideas ger- 
mane to their successful methodology entirely ig- 
nore the whole mass of adverse evidence. We have 
here a colossal example of anti-empirical dogma- 
tism arising from a successful methodology. Evi- 
dence which lies outside the method simply does 
not count. 

We are, of course, reminded that the neglect of 
this evidence arises from the fact that it lies out- 
side the scope of the methodology of the science. 
That method consists in tracing the persistence of 



12 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

the physical and chemical principles throughout 
physiological operations. 

The brilliant success of this method is admitted. 
But you cannot limit a problem by reason of a 
method of attack. The problem is to understand the 
operations of an animal body. There is clear evi- 
dence that certain operations of certain animal 
bodies depend upon the foresight of an end and the 
purpose to attain it. It is no solution of the problem 
to ignore this evidence because other operations have 
been explained in terms of physical and chemical 
laws. The existence of a problem is not even ac- 
knowledged. It is vehemently denied. Many a scien- 
tist has patiently designed experiments for the 
purpose of substantiating his belief that animal 
operations ate motivated by no purposes. He has 
perhaps spent his spare time in writing articles to 
prove that human beings are as other animals so 
that "purpose" is a category irrelevant for the ex- 
planation of their bodily activities, his own activities 
included. Scientists animated by the purpose of 
proving that they are purposeless constitute an in- 
teresting subject for study. 

Another reason for the extrusion of final cau- 
sation is that it introduces a dangerous mode of 
facile explanation. This is certainly true. The la- 
borious work of tracing the sequence in physical 
antecedents is apt to be discouraged by the facile 
suggestion of a final cause. Yet the mere fact that 
the introduction of the notion of final causation has 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON IS 

its dangers is no reason for ignoring a real problem. 
Even if heads be weak, the problem remains. 

The Christian clergy have often brought for- 
ward the same objections to innovations judged 
dangerous to faith and morals. The scientific world 
vehemently resents such limitations to the free con- 
sideration of evidence. Yet in defence of their own 
dogmas, the scientists act no otherwise than do the 
clergy. The physiologists and the legislature of the 
State of Tennessee exhibit the same principles of 
human conduct. In fact all types of men are on a 
level in this respect, and we shall never improve un- 
less we understand the source of our temptation. 

The evolution of Reason from below has been en- 
tirely pragmatic, with a short range of forecast. The 
primitive deep-seated satisfaction derived from 
Reason, a satisfaction arising out of an immemorial 
heredity, is provided by the emphatic clarification 
of some method regulating current practice. The 
method works and Reason is satisfied. There is no 
interest beyond the scope of the method. Indeed this 
last statement is too restrained. There is active in- 
terest restraining curiosity within the scope of the 
method. Any defeat of that interest arouses an emo- 
tional resentment. Empiricism vanishes. 

The best chance for the wider survey is that it 
also should present itself with the promise of a wider 
method. Sometimes the reigning method is already 
showing signs of exhaustion. The main evidence that 
a methodology is worn out comes when progress 
within it no longer deals with main issues. There is 



14 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

a final epoch of endless wrangling over minor ques- 
tions* 

Each methodology has its own life history. It 
starts as a dodge facilitating the accomplishment of 
some nascent urge of life. In its prime, it represents 
some wide coordination of thought and action where- 
by this urge expresses itself as a major satisfaction 
of existence. Finally it enters upon the lassitude of 
old age, its second childhood. The larger contrasts 
attainable within the scope of the method have been 
explored and familiarized. The satisfaction from 
repetition has faded away. Life then faces the last 
alternatives in which its fate depends. 

These last alternatives arise from the character 
of the three-fold urge which I have already men- 
tioned: To live, to live well, to live better. The birth 
of a methodology is in its essence the discovery of a 
dodge to live. In its prime it satisfies the immediate 
conditions for the good life. But the good life is un- 
stable: the law of fatigue is inexorable. When any 
methodology of life has exhausted the novelties 
within its scope and played upon them up to the in- 
coming of fatigue, one final decision determines the 
fate of a species. It can stabilize itself, and relapse 
so as to live; or it can shake itself free, and enter 
upon the adventure of living better. 

In the latter event, the species seizes upon one of 
the nascent methodologies concealed in the welter of 
miscellaneous experience beyond the scope of the 
old dominant way. If the choice be happy, evolution 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 15 

has taken an upward trend : if unhappy, the oblivion 
of time covers the vestiges of a vanished race. 

With a happy choice, the new method quickly 
reaches its meridian stage. There is thus a new form 
of the good life, with its prolongation depending on 
the variety of contrast included within its method- 
ical scope. On the whole, the evidence points to a 
certain speed of evolution from a nascent method- 
ology into the middle stage which is relatively 
prolonged. 

In the former event, when the species refuses ad- 
venture, there is relapse into the well-attested habit 
of mere life. The original method now enters upon 
a prolonged old age in which well-being has sunk 
back into mere being. Varied freshness has been lost, 
and the species lives upon the blind appetitions of 
old usages. The essence of Reason in its lowliest 
forms is its judgments upon flashes of novelty, of 
novelty in immediate realization and of novelty which 
is relevant to appetition but not yet to action. In the 
stabilized life there is no room for Reason. The 
methodology has sunk from a method of novelty in- 
to a method of repetition. Reason is the organ of 
emphasis upon novelty. It provides the judgment 
by which realization in idea obtains the emphasis by 
which it passes into realization in purpose, and 
thence its realization in fact. 

Life-tedium is fatigue derived from a thwarted 
urge toward novel contrast. In nature we find three 
ways in which stabilization is secured. They may be 
named: the Way of Blindness, the Way of Rhythm, 



16 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

the Way of Transience. These ways are not mu- 
tually exclusive. In fact the Way of Rhythm 
seems all-pervasive throughout life. But the Way 
of Blindness seems to render Transience unneces- 
sary, and the Way of Transience diminishes the 
Blindness. All three ways seem to be present in a 
stabilized old age of mere survival, but Blindness 
and Transience seem to vary inversely to each other. 

The Way of Blindness means relapse. This relapse 
eliminates those flashes of novel appetition which 
have constituted the means of ascent to the exist- 
ing stage of complex life. These flashes are in fact 
part of the stage itself. They are the element of 
vivid novelty of enjoyment. But the ladder of ascent 
is now discarded. The novelties and their reasoned 
emphasis are excluded. The complexity attained is 
lived through on a lower level of operations than 
those which went to its attainment. The upward 
trend is lost. There is stabilization in some lower 
level, or progressive relapse. The organ of vivid- 
ness, which is also the organ of novelty and the or- 
gan of fatigue, has been atrophied. 

The Way of Transience means the substitution 
of short-lived individuals by way of protecting the 
species from the fatigue of the individual. Tran- 
sience is really a way of blindness : it procures novel 
individuals to face blindly the old round of experi- 
ence. 

The Way of Rhythm pervades all life, and indeed 
all physical existence. This common principle of 
Rhythm is one of the reasons for believing that the 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 17 

root principles of life are, in some lowly form, ex- 
emplified in all types of physical existence. In the 
Way of Rhythm a round of experiences, forming a 
determinate sequence of contrasts attainable within 
a definite method, are codified so that the end of one 
such cycle is the proper antecedent stage for the be- 
ginning of another such cycle. The cycle is such 
that its own completion provides the conditions for 
its own mere repetition. It eliminates the fatigue 
attendant upon the repetition of any one of its 
parts. Only some strength of physical memory can 
aggregate fatigue arising from the cycle as a whole. 
Provided that each cycle in itself is self -repairing, 
the fatigue from repetition requires a high level of 
coordination of stretches of past experience. 

At the level of human experience we do find 
fatigue arising from the mere repetition of cycles. 
The device by which this fatigue is again obviated 
takes the form of the preservation of the funda- 
mental abstract structure of the cycle, combined 
with the variation of the concrete details of succeed- 
ing cycles. This device is particularly illustrated in 
music and in vision. It is of course capable of an 
enormous elaboration of complexity of detail. Thus 
the Rhythm of life is not merely to be sought in 
simple cyclical recurrence. The cycle element is 
driven into the foundation, and variations of cycles, 
and of cycles of cycles, are elaborated. 

We find here the most obvious example of the 
adoption of a method. The good life is attained by 
the enjoyment of contrasts within the scope of the 



18 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

method. We exemplify in this way the action of 
appetition working within a framework of order. 
Reason finds its scope here in its function of the 
direction of the upward trend. In its lowliest form, 
Reason provides the emphasis on the conceptual 
clutch after some refreshing novelty. It is then 
Reason devoid of constructive range of abstract 
thought. It operates merely as the simple direct 
judgment lifting a conceptual flash into an effective 
appetition, and an effective appetition into a rea- 
lized fact. 

"Fatigue" is the antithesis of Reason. The opera- 
tions of Fatigue constitute the defeat of Reason in 
its primitive character of reaching after the upward 
trend. Fatigue means the operation of excluding 
the impulse towards novelty. It excludes the oppor- 
tunities of the immediate stage at which life finds 
itself. That stage has been reached by seizing oppor- 
tunity. The meridian triumph of a method is when 
it facilitates opportunity without any transcending 
of itself. Mere repetition is the baffling of oppor- 
tunity. The inertia weighing upon Reason is gen- 
eration of a mere recurrent round of change, un- 
relieved by novelty. The urge of Reason, clogged 
with such inertia, is fatigue. When the baffled urge 
has finally vanished, life preserves its stage so far 
as concerns its formal operations. But it has lost the 
impulse by which the stage was reached, an impulse 
which constituted an original element in the stage 
itself. There has been a relapse into mere repetitive 
life, concerned with mere living and divested of any 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 19 

factor involving effort towards living well, and still 
less of any effort toward living better. This stage of 
static life never truly attains stability. It represents 
a slow, prolonged decay in which the complexity of 
the organism gradually declines towards simpler 
forms. 

In this general description of the primitive func- 
tion of Reason in animal life, the analogy of a 
living body, with its own self-contained organiza- 
tion, to the self-contained physical organization of 
the material universe as a whole, has been closely 
followed. The material universe has contained in 
itself, and perhaps still contains, some mysterious 
impulse for its energy to run upwards. This im- 
pulse is veiled from our observation, so far as con- 
cerns its general operation. But there must have 
been some epoch in which the dominant trend was 
the formation of protons, electrons, molecules, and 
stars. Today, so far as our observations go, they 
are decaying. We know more of the animal body, 
through the medium of our personal experience. In 
the animal body, we can observe the appetition 
towards the upward trend, with Reason as the 
selective agency. In the general physical universe 
we cannot obtain any direct knowledge of the corre- 
sponding agency by which it attained its present 
stage of available energy. The aggregations of 
energy in the form of protons, electrons, molecules, 
cosmic dust, stars, and planets, are there. However 
vast may be the scale of the physical order, it ap- 
pears to be finite, and it is wasting at a finite rate. 



20 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

However long the periods of time may have been, 
there must have been a beginning of the mere waste, 
and there must be an end to it. From nothing, there 
can come nothing. 

The universe, as construed solely in terms of the 
efficient causation of purely physical interconnec- 
tions, presents a sheer, insoluble contradiction. The 
orthodox doctrine of the physiologists demands that 
the operations of living bodies be explained solely 
in terms of the physical system of physical cate- 
gories. This system within its own province, when 
confronted with the empirical facts, fails to include 
these facts apart from an act of logical suicide. The 
moral to be drawn from the general survey of the 
physical universe with its operations viewed in 
terms of purely physical laws, and neglected so far 
as they are inexpressible in such terms, is that we 
have omitted some general counter-agency. This 
counter-agency in its operation throughout the 
physical universe is too vast and diffusive for our 
direct observation. We may acquire such power as 
the result of some advance. But at present, as we 
survey the physical cosmos, there is no direct intui- 
tion of the counter-agency to which it owes its possi- 
bility of existence as a wasting finite organism. 

Thus the orthodox physiological doctrine has the 
weakness that it rests its explanations exclusively 
upon the physical system, which is internally in- 
consistent. 

In the animal body there is, as we have already 
seen, clear evidence of activities directed by pur- 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 21 

pose. It is therefore natural to reverse the analogy, 
and to argue that some lowly, diffused form of the 
operations of Reason constitute the vast diffused 
counter-agency by which the material cosmos comes 
into being. This conclusion amounts to the repudia- 
tion of the radical extrusion of final causation from 
our cosmological theory. The rejection of purpose 
dates from Francis Bacon at the beginning of the 
seventeenth century. As a methodological device 
it is an unquestioned success so long as we confine 
attention to certain limited fields. 

Provided that we admit the category of final 
causation, we can consistently define the primary 
function of Reason. This function is to constitute, 
emphasize, and criticize the final causes and strength 
of aims directed towards them. 

The pragmatic doctrine must accept this defini- 
tion. It is obvious that pragmatism is nonsense apart 
from final causation. For a doctrine can never be 
tested unless it is acted upon. Apart from this pri- 
mary function the very existence of Reason is pur- 
poseless and its origination is inexplicable. In the 
course of evolution why should the trend have ar- 
rived at mankind, if his activities of Reason remain 
without influence on his bodily actions ? It is well to 
be quite clear on the point that Reason is inexplic- 
able if purpose be ineffective. 

Thus at the very outset the primary physiological 
doctrine has to be examined. This examination leads 
to the distinction between the authority of science in 
the determination of its methodology and the au- 



22 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

thority of science in the determination of the ulti- 
mate categories of explanation. We are then led to 
consider the natural reaction of men with a useful 
methodology against any evidence tending to limit 
the scope of that methodology. Science has always 
suffered from the vice of overstatement. In this way 
conclusions true within strict limitations have been 
generalized dogmatically into a fallacious uni- 
versality. 

This pragmatic function of Reason provides the 
agency procuring the upward trend of animal evolu- 
tion. But the doctrine of the upward trend equally 
requires explanation in the purely physical cosmos. 
Our scientific formulation of physics displays a 
limited universe in process of dissipation. We re- 
quire a counter-agency to explain the existence 
of a universe in dissipation within a finite time. The 
analogy of the animal body suggests that the ex- 
treme rejection of final causation from our cate- 
gories of explanation has been fallacious. A satis- 
factory cosmology must explain the interweaving of 
efficient and of final causation. Such a cosmology 
will obviously remain an explanatory arbitrariness if 
our doctrine of the two modes of causation takes the 
form of a mere limitation of the scope of one mode 
by the intervention of the other mode. What we seek 
is such an explanation of the metaphysical nature 
of things that everything determinable by efficient 
causation is thereby determined, and that every- 
thing determinable by final causation is thereby 
determined. The two spheres of operation should be 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 23 

interwoven and required, each by the other. But 
neither sphere should arbitrarily limit the scope of 
the alternative mode. 

Meanwhile, we find that the short-range function 
of Reason, characteristic of Ulysses, is Reason criti- 
cizing and emphasizing the subordinate purposes in 
nature which are the agents of final causation. This 
is Reason as a pragmatic agent. 

In this function Reason is the practical embodi- 
ment of the urge to transform mere existence into 
the good existence, and to transform the good exist- 
ence into the better existence. 

But if we survey the universe of nature, mere 
static survival seems to be the general rule, ac- 
companied by a slow decay. The instances of the 
upward trend are represented by a sprinkling of 
exceptional cases. Thus the general fact, as em- 
pirically presented to us, appears to the upward 
trend of the few, combined with a slow slipping 
away of the old widespread physical order forming 
the basis from which the ascent is made. 

This empirical fact constitutes one of the deepest 
unsolved mysteries. 

When we have recognized these two tendencies at 
work, it is inevitable that we ask how we can con- 
ceive the nature of things so as to include this double 
character. We all remember Bergson's doctrine of 
the elan vital and its relapse into matter. The double 
tendency of advance and relapse is here plainly 
stated. But we are not given any explanatory in- 
sight. The older doctrine of individual substances 



24 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

with their inherent qualities does not give the slight- 
est reason for the double aspect. But there is another 
obvious duality in the world which it is the first busi- 
ness of every cosmology to consider Body and 
Mind. If we follow Descartes and express this 
duality in terms of the concept of substance, we ob- 
tain the notion of bodily substances and of mental 
substances. The bodily substances have, on this 
theory, a vacuous existence. They are sheer facts, 
devoid of all intrinsic values. It is intrinsically im- 
possible to give any reason why they should come 
into existence, or should endure, or should cease to 
exist. Descartes tells us that they are sustained by 
God, but fails to give any reason why God should 
care to do so. This conception of vacuous substantial 
existence lacks all explanatory insight. The move- 
ment to exclude final causation has thus ended by 
making the doctrine of efficient causation equally 
inexplicable. Descartes had to call in God, in order 
to push his bodies around. The two tendencies up- 
ward and downward cannot be torn apart. They 
exist together. Also Descartes' clean cut between 
bodies and minds is a misreading of the empirical 
facts. 

We shall never elaborate an explanatory meta- 
physics unless we abolish this notion of valueless, 
vacuous existence. Vacuity is the character of an ab- 
straction, and is wrongly introduced into the notion 
of a finally real thing, an actuality. Universals and 
propositions are vacuous, but are not actualities. 
But if we discard the notion of vacuous existence, 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 25 

we must conceive each actuality as attaining an end 
for itself. Its very existence is the presentation of 
its many components to itself, for the sake of its 
own ends. In other words, an actuality is a complex 
unity, which can be analysed as a process of feeling 
its own components. This is the doctrine that each 
actuality is an occasion of experience, the outcome 
of its own purposes. 

Now I am pursuing the ordinary scientific 
method of searching for an explanation. Having 
found one example of a fundamental duality in the 
universe, namely the physical tendency towards 
degradation and the counter-tendency upwards, I 
am enumerating the other basic dualities, with the 
hope of tying them up into one coherent concept in 
which they explain each other. We have now to ask 
how we can interpret the upward and the downward 
trends, and body and mind, as two coordinate du- 
alities essential in the nature of experience. 

Bodily experience is sheer physical experience. 
Such experience is the sheer final enjoyment of be- 
ing definitely something. It is self -definition as con- 
stituting one sheer fact among other things, namely 
among other actualities and selected forms of defi- 
niteness. Physical experience is the matter-of-fact 
enjoyment of just those items which are given to 
that occasion. Every component in physical experi- 
ence is playing its part in sheer matter-of-fact. 

But every occasion of experience is dipolar. It 
is mental experience integrated with physical ex- 
perience. Mental experience is the converse of 



26 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

bodily experience. It is the experience of forms of 
definiteness in respect to their disconnection from 
any particular physical experience, but with ab- 
stract evaluation of what they can contribute to 
such experience. Consciousness is no necessary ele- 
ment in mental experience. The lowest form of 
mental experience is blind urge towards a form of 
experience, that is to say, an urge towards a form 
for realization. These forms of definiteness are the 
Platonic forms, the Platonic ideas, the medieval 
universals. 

In its essence, mentality is the urge towards some 
vacuous definiteness, to include it in matter-of-fact 
which is non- vacuous enjoyment. This urge is ap- 
petition. It is emotional purpose : it is agency. Men- 
tality is no more vacuous than is physical enjoyment. 
But it brings the sheer vacuity of the form into 
the realization of experience. In physical experience, 
the forms are the defining factors: in mental ex- 
perience the forms connect the immediate occasions 
with occasions which lie beyond. The connection of 
immediate fact with the future resides in its appeti- 
tions. 

The higher forms of intellectual experience only 
arise when there are complex integrations, and re- 
integrations, of mental and physical experience. 
Reason then appears as a criticism of appetitions. 
It is a second-order type of mentality. It is the ap- 
petition of appetitions. 

Mental experience is the organ of novelty, the 
urge beyond. It seeks to vivify the massive physical 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 27 

fact, which is repetitive, with the novelties which 
beckon. Thus mental experience contains in itself a 
factor of anarchy. We can understand order, be- 
cause in the recesses of our own experience there is 
a contrasting element which is anarchic. 

But sheer anarchy means the nothingness of ex- 
perience. We enjoy the contrasts of our own variety 
in virtue of the order which removes the incom- 
patibility of mere diversity. Thus mental experience 
must itself be canalized into order. 

In its lowest form, mental experience is canal- 
ized into slavish conformity. It is merely the appeti- 
tion towards, or from, whatever in fact already is. 
The slavish thirst in a desert is mere urge from 
intolerable dryness. This lowest form of slavish con- 
formity pervades all nature. It is rather a capacity 
for mentality, than mentality itself. But it is men- 
tality. In this lowly form it evades no difficulties: 
it strikes out no new ways : it produces no disturb- 
ance of the repetitive character of physical fact. It 
can stretch out no arm to save nature from its 
ultimate decay. It is degraded to being merely one 
of the actors in the efficient causation. 

But when mentality is working at a high level, 
it brings novelty into the appetitions of mental 
experience. In this function, there is a sheer element 
of anarchy. But mentality now becomes self -regula- 
tive. It canalizes its own operations by its own 
judgments. It introduces a higher appetition which 
discriminates among its own anarchic productions. 
Reason appears. It is Reason, thus conceived, which 



28 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

is the subject-matter of this discussion. We have to 
consider the introduction of anarchy, the revolt from 
anarchy, the use of anarchy, and the regulation of 
anarchy. Reason civilizes the brute force of anarchic 
appetition. Apart from anarchic appetition, nature 
is doomed to slow descent towards nothingness. 
Mere repetitive experience gradually eliminates ele- 
ment after element and fades towards vacuity. 
Mere anarchic appetition accomplishes quickly the 
same end, reached slowly by repetition. Reason is 
the special embodiment in us of the disciplined 
counter-agency which saves the world. 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

CHAPTER II 

In the preceding chapter, two aspects of the func- 
tion of Reason have been discriminated. In one 
aspect, the function of Reason was practical. To its 
operation, the piecemeal discovery and clarification 
of methodologies is due. In this way it not only 
elaborates the methodology, but also lifts into con- 
scious experience the detailed operations possible 
within the limits of that method. In this aspect, 
Reason is the enlightenment of purpose; within 
limits, it renders purpose effective. Also when it has 
rendered purpose effective, it has fulfilled its func- 
tion and lulls itself with self-satisfaction. It has 
finished its task. This aspect of the operations of 
Reason was connected with the legend of Ulysses. 

The other aspect of the function of Reason was 
connected with the life-work of Plato. In this func- 
tion Reason is enthroned above the practical tasks of 
the world. It is not concerned with keeping alive. It 
seeks with disinterested curiosity an understanding 
of the world. Naught that happens is alien to it. It 
is driven forward by the ultimate faith that all par- 
ticular fact is understandable as illustrating the 
general principles of its own nature and of its status 
among other particular facts. It fulfils its function 
when understanding has been gained. Its sole satis- 



SO THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

faction is that experience has been understood. It 
presupposes life, and seeks life rendered good with 
the goodness of understanding. Also so long as un- 
derstanding is incomplete, it remains to that extent 
unsatisfied. It thus constitutes itself the urge from 
the good life to the better life. But the progress 
which it seeks is always the progress of a better 
understanding. This is the urge of disinterested 
curiosity. In this function Reason serves only itself. 
It is its own dominant interest, and is not deflected 
by motives derived from other dominant interests 
which it may be promoting. This is the speculative 
Reason. 

There is a strong moral intuition that speculative 
understanding for its own sake is one of the ultimate 
elements in the good life. The passionate claim for 
freedom of thought is based upon it. Unlike some 
other moral feelings, this intuition is not wide- 
spread. Throughout the generality of mankind it 
flickers with very feeble intensity. But it has been 
transmitted through the generations in a succession 
of outstanding individuals who command unques- 
tioned reverence. Also the perennial struggle be- 
tween Reason and Authority, is tinged with bitter- 
ness by the intrusion of this sentiment of an ultimate 
moral claim. 

The whole story of Solomon's dream suggests 
that the antithesis between the two functions of 
Reason is not quite so sharp as it seems at first 
sight. The speculative Reason produces that accu- 
mulation of theoretical understanding which at 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 31 

critical moments enables a transition to be made 
toward new methodologies. Also the discoveries of 
the practical understanding provide the raw ma- 
terial necessary for the success of the speculative 
Reason. But when all allowance has been made for 
this interplay of the two functions, there remains the 
essential distinction between operations of Reason 
governed by the purposes of some external domi- 
nant interest, and operations of Reason governed 
by the immediate satisfaction arising from them- 
selves. For example, truthfulness as an element in 
one's own self-respect issues from a reverence for 
Reason in its own right. Whereas truthfulness as a 
dodge usually necessary for a happy life depends 
upon the notion of Reason as serving alien purposes. 
Sometimes these two grounds for truthfulness are 
at issue with each other. It may happen that the 
moral issues depending on the latter ground for im- 
mediate truthfulness, or for its abandonment, may 
be superior to those depending on the former 
ground. But the point of immediate interest is that 
these two grounds for truthfulness bear witness to 
the two functions of Reason. 

The history of the practical Reason must be 
traced back into the animal life from which mankind 
emerged. Its span is measured in terms of millions 
of years, if we have regard to the faint sporadic 
flashes of intelligence which guided the slow elabo- 
ration of methods. A survey of species seems to 
show that a customary method soon supersedes the 
necessity for such flashes of progress. In this way 



32 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

custom supersedes any trace of thought which 
might transcend it. The species sinks into a sta- 
tionary stage in which thought is canalized between 
the banks of custom. 

The history of the speculative Reason is alto- 
gether shorter. It belongs to the history of civiliza- 
tion, and its span is about six thousand years. But 
the critical discovery which gave to the speculative 
Reason its supreme importance was made by the 
Greeks. Their discovery of mathematics and of 
logic introduced method into speculation. Reason 
was now armed with an objective test and with a 
method of progress. In this way Reason was freed 
from its sole dependence on mystic vision and 
fanciful suggestion. Its method of evolution was de- 
rived from itself. It ceased to produce a mere series 
of detached judgments. It produced systems in- 
stead of inspirations. The speculative Reason armed 
with the Greek methods, is older than two thousand 
years only by a few centuries. 

The ascription of the modern phase of the specu- 
lative Reason wholly to the Greeks, is an exaggera- 
tion. The great Asiatic civilizations, Indian and 
Chinese, also produced variants of the same method. 
But none of these variants gained the perfected 
technique of the Greek method. Their modes of 
handling speculative Reason were effective for the 
abstract religious speculation, and for phil- 
osophical speculation, but failed before natural 
science and mathematics. The Greeks produced the 
final instrument for the discipline of speculation. 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON S3 

If, however, we include the Asiatic anticipations, 
we may give about three thousand years for 
the effective use of speculative Reason. This short 
period constitutes the modern history of the 
human race. Within this period all the great re- 
ligions have been produced, the great rational 
philosophies, the great sciences. The inward life 
of man has been transformed. 

But until the last hundred and fifty years, the 
speculative Reason produced singularly little effect 
upon technology and upon art. It is arguable that 
on the whole within the modern period art made no 
progress, and in some respects declined. Having 
regard to the rise of modern music, we may reject 
the theory of a general decline in art. But, on the 
whole, as artists we certainly have not surpassed 
the men of a thousand years before Christ, and it 
is doubtful whether we reach their level. We seem 
to care less about art. Perhaps we have more to 
think about, and so neglect to cultivate our esthetic 
impulses. 

Technology has certainly improved during the 
last three thousand years. But it would be difficult 
to discern any influence of the speculative Reason 
upon this progress, until the most recent period. 
There does not seem to have been much quickening 
of the process. For example, the technology of 
Europe in the eighteenth century had made a very 
moderate advance over that of the Roman Empire 
in its prime. The advance does not seem to be much 
greater than that made in the two thousand years 



34 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

preceding this culmination of the classical civiliza- 
tion. 

The enormous advance in the technology of the 
last hundred and fifty years arises from the fact 
that the speculative and the practical Reason have 
at last made contact. The speculative Reason has 
lent its theoretic activity, and the practical Reason 
has lent its methodologies for dealing with the vari- 
ous types of facts. Both functions of Reason have 
gained in power. The speculative Reason has ac- 
quired content, that is to say, material for its 
theoretic activity to work upon, and the methodic 
Reason has acquired theoretic insight transcending 
its immediate limits. We should be on the threshold 
of an advance in all the values of human life. 

But such optimism requires qualification. The 
dawn of brilliant epochs is shadowed by the massive 
obscurantism of human nature. Obscurantism is the 
inertial resistance of the practical Reason, with its 
millions of years behind it, to the interference with 
its fixed methods arising from recent habits of 
speculation. This obscurantism is rooted in human 
nature more deeply than any particular subject of 
interest. It is just as strong among the men of 
science as among the clergy, and among professional 
men and business men as among the other classes. 
Obscurantism is the refusal to speculate freely on 
the limitations of traditional methods. It is more 
than that: it is the negation of the importance of 
such speculation, the insistence on incidental dan- 
gers. A few generations ago the clergy, or to 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 35 

speak more accurately, large sections of the clergy 
were the standing examples of obscurantism. Today 
their place has been taken by scientists 

By merit raised to that bad eminence. 

The obscurantists of any generation are in the main 
constituted by the greater part of the practitioners 
of the dominant methodology. Today scientific 
methods are dominant, and scientists are the ob- 
scurantists. 

In order to understand our situation today we 
must note that in the sixteenth and seventeenth cen- 
turies the educated section of western Europe in- 
herited the results of about five centuries of intense 
speculative activity. The mistaken expectation of 
obtaining a dogmatic finality in speculative first 
principles has obscured the very considerable suc- 
cess of this speculative epoch. By reason of the 
preservation of manuscripts to an extent en joyed by 
no previous nascent civilization, this ferment of 
speculation could appropriate the thoughts of the 
earlier classical speculation, Pagan and Christian, 
terminating with the decadence of Rome. This ad- 
vantage carried with it a weakness. The medieval 
movement was too learned. It formed a closed 
system of thinking about other people's thoughts. 
In this way, medieval philosophy, and indeed mod- 
ern philosophy, detracted from its utility as a disci- 
pline of speculative Reason by its inadequate grasp 
of the fecundity of nature and of the corresponding 
fecundity of thought. The scholastics confined 



36 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

themselves to framing systems out of a narrow 
round of ideas. The systems were very intelligently 
framed. Indeed they were marvels of achitectonic 
genius. But there are more ideas in heaven and on 
earth than were thought of in their philosophy. 

Yet when all this concession has been made to the 
defects of scholasticism, its success was over- 
whelming. It formed the intellectual basis of one of 
the periods of quickest advance known to history. 
The comparison of the intellectual feebleness of the 
men, even the ablest men, of the ninth and tenth 
centuries with the intellectual group of the men of 
the thirteenth century discloses the extent of this 
advance. It is not merely that in the earlier times 
the men knew less. They were intrinsically less able 
in moving about among general ideas. They failed 
to discriminate between minor peculiarities of de- 
tails and the major notions. The power of going 
for the penetrating idea, even if it has not yet been 
worked into any methodology, is what constitutes 
the progressive force of Reason. The great Greeks 
had this knack to an uncanny degree. The men of 
the thirteenth century had it. The men of the tenth 
century lacked it. In between there lay three cen- 
turies of speculative philosophy. The story is told 
to perfection in Henry Osborn Taylor's book, The 
Mediaeval Mind. What scholasticism gave to the 
European world, was penetration in the handling of 
ideas. 

All things work between limits. This law applies 
even to the speculative Reason. The understanding 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 87 

of a civilization is the understanding of its limits. 
The penetration of the generations from the thir- 
teenth to the seventeenth centuries worked within 
the limits of the ideas provided by scholasticism. 
These five centuries represent a period of the broad- 
ening of interests rather than a period of intellect- 
ual growth. Scholasticism had exhausted its possi- 
bilities. It had provided a capital of fundamental 
ideas and it had wearied mankind in its efforts to 
provide a final dogmatic system by the method of 
meditating on those ideas. New interests crept in, 
slowly at first and finally like an avalanche Greek 
literature, Greek art, Greek mathematics, Greek 
science. The men of the Renaissance wore their 
learning more lightly than did the scholastics. They 
tempered it with the joy of direct experience. Thus 
another ancient secret was discovered, a secret never 
wholly lost, but sadly in the background among the 
learned section of the medievals, the habit of look- 
ing for oneself, the habit of observation. 

The first effect was confusion. The fourteenth 
and fifteenth centuries give an impression of more 
enlightenment, but of less intellectual power than 
does the thirteenth century. In some ways it sug- 
gests an intellectual throw back to the tenth cen- 
tury. There is the sense of dazed men groping, so 
far as concerns intellectual interests. The men of 
the early Renaissance never seem quite clear in 
their minds whether they should sacrifice a cock or 
celebrate the mass. They compromised by doing 
both. 



38 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

But this analogy is very superficial. The medieval 
inheritance was never lost. After the first period of 
bewilderment, their penetration in the circle of 
scholastic ideas came to the fore. The men of the 
sixteenth and seventeenth centuries founded the 
various modern sciences, natural sciences and moral 
sciences, with their first principles expressed in 
terms which the great scholastics would have under- 
stood at a glance. 

The reason why the founders of modern science 
were so unconscious of their debt to the medievals 
was that they had no idea that men could think in 
any other terms, or for lack of penetration could 
fail to think at all. Galileo and his antagonists the 
"Aristotelians" were rival schools employing the 
same general stock of ideas, and with the same 
penetrative ability in handling those ideas. The re- 
casting of the medieval ideas so as to form the 
foundations of the modern sciences was one of the 
intellectual triumphs of the world. It was chiefly 
accomplished in the seventeenth century, though 
the whole process occupied about two or three cen- 
turies, taking into consideration all the sciences. 
But in celebrating this triumph it is ungrateful to 
forget the earlier centuries of scholastic prepara- 
tion. 

Science has been developed under the impulse of 
the speculative Reason, the desire for explanatory 
knowledge. Its reaction on technology did not com- 
mence till after the invention of the improved steam 
engine in the year 1769. Even then, the nineteenth 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 39 

century was well advanced before this reaction be- 
came one of the dominating facts. Of course, scien- 
tific instruments were invented the telescope, the 
microscope, and the thermometer, for instance. 
Also some slight reactions on technical procedure 
can be traced. But the instruments were used mainly 
for scientific purposes, and technical improvements 
were initiated from hints gathered from all kinds 
of chances, scientific knowledge among others. 
There was nothing systematic and dominating in 
the interplay between science and technical pro- 
cedure. The one great exception was the foundation 
of the Greenwich Observatory for the improvement 
of navigation. 

The antagonism between science and metaphysics 
has, like all family quarrels, been disastrous. It was 
provoked by the obscurantism of the metaphysicians 
in the later Middle Ages. Of course, there were 
many exceptions. For example, the famous Cardi- 
nal, Nicholas of Cusa, illustrated the fact that quite 
a different turn might have been given the history 
of European thought. But the understanding of the 
proper functions of speculative thought was ham- 
pered by the fallacy of dogmatism. It was con- 
ceived that metaphysical thought started from 
principles which were individually clear, distinct, 
and certain. The result was that the tentative 
methods of science seemed quite at variance with 
dogmatic habits of metaphysicians. Also science it- 
self was not quite so certain of its tentative pro- 
cedure. The triumph of the Newtonian physics 



40 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

settled science upon a dogmatic foundation of ma- 
terialistic ideas which lasted for two centuries. Un- 
fortunately this approach to the metaphysical 
dogmatism did not produce a sense of fellowship 
even in evil habits. For if scientific materialism be 
the last word, metaphysics must be useless for 
physical science. The ultimate truths about nature 
are then not capable of any explanatory interpreta- 
tion. On this theory, all that there is to be known 
is that inexplicable bits of matter are hurrying 
about with their motions correlated by inexplicable 
laws expressible in terms of their spatial relations 
to each other. If this be the final dogmatic truth, 
philosophy can have nothing to say to natural 
science. 

In addition to the natural human tendency to 
turn a successful methodology into a dogmatic 
creed, the two sciences of mathematics and theology 
must bear the blame of fostering the dogmatic habit 
in European thought. The premises of mathematics 
seem clear, distinct, and certain. Arithmetic and 
geometry, as it seemed, could not be otherwise and 
they applied throughout the realm of nature. Also 
theology, by reason of its formulation of questions 
concerning our most intimate, sensitive interests, 
has always shrunk from facing the moments of be- 
wilderment inherent in any tentative approach to 
the formulation of ideas. 

The separation of philosophy and natural science, 
due to the dominance of Newtonian materialism, 
is indicated by the division of science into "moral 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 41 

science" and "natural science." For example, the 
University of Cambridge has inherited the term 
"moral science" for its department of philosophic 
studies. The notion is that philosophy is concerned 
with topics of the mind, and that natural science 
takes care of topics concerning matter. The whole 
conception of philosophy as concerned with the dis- 
cipline of the speculative Reason, to which nothing 
is alien, has vanished. Newton himself was one of the 
early scientists who most emphatically repudiated 
the intrusion of metaphysics into science. There is 
plenty of evidence that, like many another man of 
genius, his nerves were delicately balanced. For 
such men the intrusion of alien considerations into 
the narrow way of a secure technology produces 
mere bewildered irritation, by reason of its disturb- 
ance of the sense of supreme mastery within the 
methods of their technique. Of course it would be 
foolish to believe that any man should dissipate his 
energies by straying beyond his own best lines of 
activity. But the pursuit of knowledge is a coopera- 
tive enterprise, and the repudiation of the relevance 
of diverse modes of approach to the same topic re- 
quires more justification than appeal to the limita- 
tions of individual activities. 

The pathetic desire of mankind to find themselves 
starting from an intellectual basis which is clear, 
distinct, and certain, is illustrated by Newton's 
boast, hypotheses non fingo, at the same time when 
he enunciated his law of universal gravitation. This 
law states that every particle of matter attracts 



42 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

every other particle of matter; though at the mo- 
ment of enunciation only planets and heavenly 
bodies had been observed to attract "particles of 
matter." The verification, that two particles of 
matter, neither of them heavenly bodies, would at- 
tract each other, had to wait for nearly a hundred 
years to elapse. But there was a second meaning to 
Newton's motto. It was an anti-Cartesian statement 
directed against the vortices. He was, quite cor- 
rectly, pointing out that his law expressed a sheer 
fact, and was not accompanied by any explanatory 
considerations concerning the character or distribu- 
tion of matter. The nemesis of the Newtonian 
physics was this barrier of materialism, constituting 
a block to any further advance to rationalism. The 
pragmatic value of Newton's methodology at that 
stage of scientific history is not in question. The 
interesting fact is the clutch at dogmatic finality. 

I need not waste time in pointing out how the 
finality both of the cosmological scheme and of the 
particular law in question has now passed into 
Limbo. Newton was weaving hypotheses. His hy- 
potheses speculatively embodied the truth vaguely 
discerned ; they embodied this truth in a definite for- 
mulation which far outran the powers of analytic 
intuition of his age. The formulae required limita- 
tion as to the scope of their application. This defi- 
nition of scope has now been provided by recent 
formulae which in their turn will, in the progress of 
science, have their scope of application defined. 
Newton's formulae were not false: they were un- 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 43 

guardedly stated. Einstein's formulae are not false : 
they are unguardedly stated. We now know how to 
guard Newton's formulae: we are ignorant of the 
limitations of Einstein's formulae. In scientific in- 
vestigations the question, True or False ?, is usually 
irrelevant. The important question is, In what 
circumstances is this formula true, and in what 
circumstances is it false? If the circumstances of 
truth be infrequent or trivial or unknown, we can 
say, with sufficient accuracy for daily use, that the 
formula is false. 

Of course the unknown limitations to Einstein's 
formulae constitute a yet more subtle limitation to 
Newton's formula. In this way dogmatic finality 
vanishes and is replaced by an asymptotic approach 
to the truth. 

The doctrine that science starts from clear and 
distinct elements in experience, and that it develops 
by a clear and distinct process of elaboration, dies 
hard. There is a constant endeavor to explain the 
methodology of science in terms which, by reason 
of their clarity and distinctness, require no meta- 
physical elucidation. Undoubtedly it is possible to 
express the procedure of science with a happy am- 
biguity which can receive interpretation from a 
variety of metaphysical schools. But when we press 
the question so as to determine without ambiguity 
the procedure of science, we become involved in the 
metaphysical formulations of the speculative Rea- 
son. 

The modern doctrine, popular among scientists, 



44 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

is that science is the mere description of things ob- 
served. As such it assumes nothing, neither an ob- 
jective world, nor causation, nor induction. A 
simple formula which describes the universals com- 
mon to many occurrences is scientifically preferable 
to the complexity of many descriptions of many oc- 
currences. Thus the quest of science is simplicity of 
description. The conclusion is that science, thus de- 
fined, needs no metaphysics. We can then revert to 
the naive doctrine of the University of Cambridge, 
and divide knowledge into natural science and 
moral science, each irrelevant to the other. 

This doctrine is beautif ully, clear ; and in the sense 
in which the doctrine is clear, natural science can be 
of no importance. We can only urge the importance 
of science by destroying the clarity of the doctrine. 

Mere observations are particular occurrences. 
Thus if science be concerned with mere observations, 
it is an epitome of certain occurrences in the lives of 
certain men of science. A treatise on a scientific sub- 
ject is merely an alternative way of editing a 
ff Scientific Who's Who" with most of the proper 
names left out. For science is only concerned with 
particular observations made by particular men. 
Thus the world is in possession of four kinds of 
biographies, the old-fashioned "Life and Letters" 
in two volumes, the new-fashioned biography of the 
Lytton Strachey school, the Who's Who type, and 
the variant on the Who's Who type which is termed 
a treatise on some particular branch of science. Un- 
less we are interested in the particular observers the 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 45 

scientific treatise is of no interest. Unfortunately 
most of the observers' names are omitted in these 
treatises so all interest has evaporated. 

Thus, if the doctrine of science as the quest for 
simplicity of description, be construed in the sense 
in which it frees science for metaphysics, in that 
sense science loses its importance. But, as the doc- 
trine is usually handled by its adherents, meta- 
physics having been dismissed by one interpretation, 
the importance of science is preserved by the substi- 
tution of another interpretation. Two new notions 
are introduced, both requiring metaphysical discus- 
sion for their elucidation. One is the notion of in- 
ductive generalization, whereby future observations 
are brought into the scope of the scientific state- 
ments. The other is a more complex notion. It 
commences by introducing the notion of the observ- 
able, but not observed. It then proceeds by intro- 
ducing a speculative description of spatio-temporal 
occurrences which constitute the factual basis in 
virtue of which this observability is predicated. It 
finally proceeds to predict, on the basis of this de- 
scription and by reason of the facts thus described, 
the observability of occurrences generically differ- 
ent from any hitherto made. 

For example, one type of observations, wholly 
visual, suggests a theory of electromagnetic equa- 
tions. By the aid of this theory the design of radio 
apparatus, transmitting and receiving, is worked 
out. Finally a band plays in the laboratory of some 
radio station and people over an area with a radius 



46 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

of hundreds of miles listen to the music. Is it cred- 
ible to believe that the only principle involved is the 
mere description of the original particular observa- 
tions? 

We are told, however, that we have misconstrued 
the intermediate step by terming it "a speculative 
description of spatio-temporal occurrences." The 
proper way of expressing the procedure of science 
is to say that the intermediate step is simply the 
production of a mathematical formula, and that by 
the aid of this formula the experiences of the people 
with receiving sets are predicted. But what is the 
formula doing? It may have some relevance to the 
sequence of experiences in some scientist's mind, 
expressing the transition from his original visual ex- 
periences to his final enjoyment of an excellent band. 
The doctrine seems unlikely and far-fetched. By a 
stretch of the mind, I can imagine it. But we have got 
to account for the experiences of the unlearned 
multitude with radio sets. They are ignorant of the 
original experiments, ignorant of the mathematical 
formulae, ignorant of the whereabouts of the band 
and of the radio laboratory, and ignorant of the 
inside mechanism both of the generating station 
and of their own radio sets. What on earth has the 
mere mathematical formula to do with the experi- 
ences of this multitude of listeners, endowed with 
this comprehensive ignorance and taking their rest 
after good dinners and a hard day's work? 

Is the formula a magical incantation? We can 
parallel this modern doctrine of the mere descrip- 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 47 

tion of observations together with the intervention 
of a mere formula, by recalling our memories of 
childhood. There is a large audience, a magician 
comes upon the stage, places a table in front of 
him, takes off his coat, turns it inside out, shows 
himself to us, then commences voluble patter with 
elaborate gestures, and finally produces two rabbits 
from his hat. We are asked to believe that it was the 
patter that did it. 

The common sense of the matter is, that the 
mathematical formulae are descriptive of those 
characteristics of the common external world which 
are relevant to the transmission of physical states 
from the band to the bodies of the listeners. 

If this be true, we are now a long way from the 
sweet simplicity of the original doctrine. We have 
introduced the notion of the external world with 
its spatio-temporal occurrences, speculatively de- 
scribed by science. We have introduced the notion 
of potentiality, by substituting the word "observ- 
able" for the word "observed." Also hundreds of 
millions of dollars have been risked in reliance upon 
inductive generalization. If we ask what we mean 
by all this apparatus of vague notions, our only 
appeal must be to the speculative Reason. 

It is quite true that exactly at this point we can 
damp down any further speculative Reason, and 
can relapse into the routine of successful metho- 
dology. But the claim of science that it can produce 
an understanding of its procedures within the limits 
of its own categories, or that those categories them- 



48 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

selves are understandable without reference to their 
status within the wider categories under explora- 
tion by the speculative Reason that claim is en- 
tirely unfounded. Insofar as philosophers have 
failed, scientists do not know what they are talking 
about when they pursue their own methods; and 
insofar as philosophers have succeeded, to that ex- 
tent scientists can attain an understanding of 
science. With the success of philosophy, blind habits 
of scientific thought are transformed into analytic 
explanation. 

The Cartesian dualism, whereby the final actu- 
alities were divided into bodies and minds, and the 
Newtonian materialistic cosmology, combined to 
set a false goal before philosophic speculation. The 
notion of mere bodies and of mere minds was ac- 
cepted uncritically. But the ideal of explaining 
either minds in terms of bodies, or bodies in terms 
of minds guided speculative thought. First Hobbes 
made bodies fundamental, and reduced minds to 
derivative factors. Then Berkeley made minds 
fundamental, and reduced bodies to derivative fac- 
tors mere ideas in the minds, and more particularly 
in the mind of God. The most important effect on 
the relations of philosophy to natural science was, 
however, produced neither by Hobbes nor by 
Berkeley, but by Kant. The effect of his Critique 
of Pure Reason was to reduce the system of nature 
to mere appearance or, to use the Greek word, the 
order of nature is phenomenal. But whether we 
prefer the word "appearance," or the word "phe- 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 49 

nomenon," the effect is the same. There can be no 
metaphysics of nature, and no approach to meta- 
physics by scanning the order of nature. For nature 
is a mere derivative appearance ; and when we con- 
sider it, we are remote from any intuition which 
tells of final truths. It is true that Kant himself did 
not draw that conclusion. The starry heavens af- 
fected him, a triumph of the obvious over philoso- 
phy. But in the long run, the effect of the Kantian 
point of view was to degrade science to the con- 
sideration of derivative details. But again the ob- 
vious triumphed. There is an insistent importance 
in the details of our phenomenal life in the phe- 
nomenal world. Kant denied that this phenomenal 
system could bring us to metaphysics. Yet ob- 
viously here we are, living phenomenally among 
phenomena. August Comte was the nemesis which 
issued from the Critique of Pure Reason. The posi- 
tivist position inverts the Kantian argument. Posi- 
tivism holds that we are certainly in the world, and 
it also holds with Kant that the system of the world 
reflects no light upon metaphysics. Anyhow from 
the side of philosophy, Kant drove a wedge be- 
tween science and the speculative Reason. This is- 
sue from Kant did not obtain its proper develop- 
ment till the nineteenth century. Kant himself and 
his immediate followers were intensely interested 
in natural science. But the English neo-Kantians 
and neo-Hegelians of the mid-nineteenth century 
were remote from natural science. 

This antagonism between philosophy and nat- 



50 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

ural science has produced unfortunate limitations of 
thought on both sides. Philosophy has ceased to 
claim its proper generality, and natural science is 
content with the narrow round of its methods. The 
seventeenth century had built the categoreal notions 
of the sciences so firmly that the divorce from phi- 
losophy practically had no effect on immediate 
progress. We have now come to a critical period of 
the general reorganisation of categories of scien- 
tific thought. Also sciences, such as psychology and 
physiology, are hovering on the edge of the crevasse 
separating science from philosophy. 

The obscurantist attitude of science is likely to 
be disastrous in retarding progress. It may be that 
we are not yet ready to effect a closer union between 
speculative thought and scientific method. One 
thing is certain : scientific opinion can have no possi- 
ble justification for coming to this conclusion. The 
rejection of any source of evidence is always treason 
to that ultimate rationalism, which urges forward 
science and philosophy alike. 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

CHAPTER III 

The speculative Reason is in its essence un- 
trammelled by method. Its function is to pierce 
into the general reasons beyond limited reasons, to 
understand all methods as coordinated in a nature 
of things only to be grasped by transcending all 
method. This infinite ideal is never to be attained 
by the bounded intelligence of mankind. But what 
distinguishes men from the animals, some humans 
from other humans, is the inclusion in their natures, 
waveringly and dimly, of a disturbing element, 
which is the flight after the unattainable. This ele- 
ment is that touch of infinity which has goaded 
races onward, sometimes to their destruction. It is 
a tropism to the beckoning light to the sun pass- 
ing toward the finality of things, and to the sun 
arising from their origin. The speculative Reason 
turns east and west, to the source and to the end, 
alike hidden below the rim of the world. 

Reason which is methodic is content to limit it- 
self within the bounds of a successful method. It 
works in the secure daylight of traditional practical 
activity. It is the discipline of shrewdness. Reason 
which is speculative questions the methods, refusing 
to let them rest. The passionate demand for free- 
dom of thought is a tribute to the deep connection 



52 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

of the speculative Reason with religious intuitions. 
The Stoics emphasized this right of the religious 
spirit to face the infinitude of things, with such 
understanding as it might. In the first period when 
the speculative Reason emerged as a distinguishable 
force, it appeared in the guise of sporadic inspira- 
tions. Seers, prophets, men with a new secret, ap- 
peared. They brought to the world fire, or salva- 
tion, or release, or moral insight. Their common 
character was to be bearers of some imaginative 
novelty, relevant and yet transcending traditional 
ways. 

The real importance of the Greeks for the prog- 
ress of the world is that they discovered the almost 
incredible secret that the speculative Reason was 
itself subject to orderly method. They robbed it of 
its anarchic character without destroying its func- 
tion of reaching beyond set bounds. That is why we 
now speak of the speculative Reason in the place of 
Inspiration. Reason appeals to the orderliness of 
what is reasonable while "speculation" expresses 
the transcendence of any particular method. The 
Greek secret is, how to be bounded by method even 
in its transcendence. They hardly understood their 
own discovery. But we have the advantage of hav- 
ing watched it in operation for twenty centuries. 

The world's experience of professed seers has on 
the whole been very unfortunate. In the main, they 
are a shady lot with a bad reputation. Even if we 
put aside those with some tinge of insincerity, there 
still remain the presumptous, ignorant, incompetent, 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 53 

unbalanced band of false prophets who deceive the 
people. On the whole, the odds are so heavily against 
any particular prophet that, apart from some 
method of testing, perhaps it is safer to stone them, 
in some merciful way. The Greeks invented logic 
in the broadest sense of that term the logic of 
discovery. The Greek logic as finally perfected by 
the experience of centuries provides a set of cri- 
teria to which the content of a belief should be 
subjected. These are: 

(i) Conformity to intuitive experience: 
(ii) Clarity of the prepositional content: 
(iii) Internal Logical consistency: 
(iv) External Logical consistency: 

(v) Status of a Logical scheme with, 

(a) widespread conformity to experience, 

(b) no discordance with experience, 

(c) coherence among its categoreal notions, 

(d) methodological consequences. 

The misconception which has haunted the ages of 
thought down to the present time is that these cri- 
teria are easy to apply. For example, the Greek 
and the medieval thinkers were under the impres- 
sion that they could easily obtain clear and distinct 
premises which conformed to experience. Accord- 
ingly they were comparatively careless in the criti- 
cism of premises, and devoted themselves to the 
elaboration of deductive systems. The moderns 
have, equally with the Greeks, assumed that it is 
easy to formulate exactly expressed propositions. 



54 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

They have also assumed that the interrogation of 
experience is a straightforward operation. But they 
have recognized that the main effort is to be devoted 
to the discovery of propositions which do in fact 
conform to experience. Thus the moderns stress 
induction. The view which I am maintaining is that 
none of these operations are easy. In fact they are 
extremely difficult. Apart from a complete meta- 
physical understanding of the universe, it is very 
difficult to understand any proposition clearly and 
distinctly, so far as concerns the analysis of its com- 
ponent elements. 

Again the analysis of experience without the in- 
troduction of interpretive elements which may be 
faulty, is extremely difficult. It follows also from 
these two difficulties that judgment of direct con- 
formity to experience is very difficult to bring to a 
decisive issue, with the elimination of all elements 
of doubt. 

There is also some doubt even as to the self -con- 
sistency of a proposition. For if the analysis of the 
proposition be vague, there is always a possibility 
that a more complete analysis will disclose a flaw. 
The same doubt also applies to the fourth criterion 
which is that of external consistency. In this case 
we are comparing the proposition under the scru- 
tiny with other propositions accepted as true. 

It is obvious that if the first two criteria were 
capable of easy determination nothing else would 
be wanted. Also if the first four criteria could be 
decisively determined, the fifth criterion would be 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 55 

unnecessary. But this last criterion is evidently a 
procedure, to remedy the difficulty of judging in- 
dividual propositions, by having recourse to a system 
of ideas, whose mutual relevance shall lend to each 
other clarity, and which hang together so that the 
verification of some reflects upon the verification of 
the others. Also if the system has the character of 
suggesting methodologies of which it is explana- 
tory, it gains the character of generating ideas 
coherent with itself and receiving continuous verifi- 
cation. 

The whole point of the fifth criterion is that the 
scheme produces a greater understanding of the 
world, including the better definition of ideas and 
the more direct analysis of immediate fact. A single 
proposition rests upon vague apprehensions: 
whereas a scheme of ideas provides its own measure 
of definiteness by the mutual relatedness of its own 
categoreal notions. 

It is by their emphasis on schemes of thought that 
the Greeks founded the various branches of science, 
which have remade civilization. A proposition which 
falls within a scientific scheme is accepted with sur- 
prisingly slight direct verification. For example, at 
the present time we all accept the famous doctrine of 
the shift of the spectral lines. But so far as direct 
evidence is concerned, there are some experiments on 
rays from the sun, with very dubious interpreta- 
tions, and the clear-cut instance of the light from 
the dark companion of Sirius. There are millions 
of untested stars, apart from the question as to 



56 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

whether the same star will always give the same 
effect. But no one doubts the doctrine because it 
falls within the reigning scientific scheme. The im- 
portance of the scheme is illustrated by imagining 
some occurrence which does not fall within any 
scheme. You go to a strange foreign country, and 
among your first observations on your first day is 
that of a man standing on his head. If you are 
cautious, you will refrain from generalizing on the 
propensity of the inhabitants to stand on their 
heads; also half your friends will disbelieve you 
when you mention the incident. Yet your direct 
evidence is comparable to that respecting the shift 
of the spectral lines. 

The production of a scheme is a major effort of 
the speculative Reason. It involves imagination far 
outrunning the direct observations. The interwoven 
group of categoreal notions which constitute the 
scheme allow of derivative extension by the con- 
structive power of deductive logic. Throughout the 
whole range of these propositions respecting the 
interrelations of the forms of things, some of them 
allow of direct comparison with experience. In this 
way, the scheme as a whole has contact with ex- 
perience. The extent of its conformity or non-con- 
formity with observed fact can thus be explored. 
A scheme which, for a time at least, is useless 
methodologically, is one which fails to yield these 
observable contacts with fact. 

An abstract scheme which is merely developed by 
the abstract methodology of logic, and which fails 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 57 

to achieve contact with fact by means of a correlate 
practical methodology of experiment, may yet be 
of the utmost importance. The history of modern 
civilization shows that such schemes fulfil the 
promise of the dream of Solomon. They first 
amplify life by satisfying the peculiar claim of the 
speculative Reason, which is understanding for its 
own sake. Secondly, they represent the capital of 
ideas which each age holds in trust for its successors. 
The ultimate moral claim that civilization lays upon 
its possessors is that they transmit, and add to, this 
reserve of potential development by which it has 
profited. One main law which underlies modern 
progress is that, except for the rarest accidents of 
chance, thought precedes observation. It may not 
decide the details, but it suggests the type. Nobody 
would count, whose mind was vacant of the idea of 
number. Nobody directs attention when there is 
nothing that he expects to see. The novel observa- 
tion which comes by chance is a rare accident, and 
is usually wasted. For if there be no scheme to fit it 
into, its significance is lost. The way of thoughtless 
nature is by waste a million seeds, and one tree; 
a million eggs, and one fish. In the same way, from 
a million observations of fact beyond the routine 
of human life it rarely happens that one useful de- 
velopment issues. 

The comparative stagnation of Asiatic civiliza- 
tion after its brilliant development was due to the 
fact that it had exhausted its capital of ideas, the 
product of curiosity. Asia had no large schemes of 



58 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

abstract thought, energizing in the minds of men 
and waiting to give significance to their chance ex- 
periences. It remained in contemplation and the ideas 
became static. This sheer contemplation of abstract 
ideas had stifled the anarchic curiosity producing 
novelty. Speculation had faded out of Reason. 
Millions had seen apples fall from trees, but New- 
ton had in his mind the mathematical scheme of 
dynamic relations: millions had seen lamps swing- 
ing in temples and churches, but Galileo had in his 
mind his vaguer anticipation of this same mathe- 
matical scheme: millions had seen animals preying 
on each other, vegetables choking each other, mil- 
lions had endured famine and thirst, but Charles 
Darwin had in his mind the Malthusian scheme. 
The secret of progress is the speculative interest in 
abstract schemes of morphology. It is hardly real- 
ized for how long a time such abstract schemes can 
grow in the minds of men before contact with prac- 
tical interests. The story of the development of 
mathematical physics has been told and retold, but 
its moral is so overwhelming that it must never be 
allowed out of sight. 

Consider the early stage of mathematics a few 
technological dodges in Egypt about two thousand 
years before Christ. It was a minor element in a 
great civilization. About five hundred years before 
Christ, the Greeks initiated its theoretical develop- 
ment for the love of the theory. This was about four 
or five hundred years after the date of Solomon's 
dream, the greatest prophecy ever made. The genius 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 59 

of the Greeks was shown by their clear divination of 
the importance of mathematics for the study of 
nature. The necessity for fostering the development 
of abstract morphology is illustrated by considering 
the state of the science of geometry at the commence- 
ment of the sixteenth century. The science had 
been studied for about two thousand years. It had 
been elaborated in great detail. But, allowing for 
some minor qualifications, nothing had come from 
it except the intrinsic interest of the study. Then, 
as if a door had suddenly opened, Kepler produced 
the first important utilization of conic sections, the 
first among hundreds, Descartes and Desargues 
revolutionized the methods of the science, Newton 
wrote his Principia, and the modern period of civili- 
zation commenced. Apart from the capital of ab- 
stract ideas which had accumulated slowly during 
two thousand years, our modern life would have 
been impossible. There is nothing magical about 
mathematics as such. It is simply the greatest ex- 
ample of a science of abstract forms. 

The abstract theory of music is another such 
science: the abstract theory of political economy is 
another: and the abstract theory of the currency is 
another. The point is that the development of ab- 
stract theory precedes the understanding of fact. 
The instance of political economy illustrates an- 
other important point. We all know that abstract 
political economy has in recent years been somewhat 
under a cloud. It deals with men under an abstrac- 
tion; it limits its view to the "economic man." It 



60 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

also makes assumptions as to markets and competi- 
tion which neglect many important factors. We 
have here an example of the necessity of transcend- 
ing a given morphological scheme. Up to a point the 
scheme is invaluable. It clarifies thought, it suggests 
observation, it explains fact. But there is a strict 
limit to the utility of any finite scheme. If the 
scheme be pressed beyond its proper scope, definite 
error results. The art of the speculative Reason con- 
sists quite as much in the transcendence of schemes 
as in their utilization. 

Mathematical physics suggests another reflection. 
We must dwell upon the extreme abstractness of 
the mathematical ideas involved. It is surprising 
that a scheme of such abstract ideas should have 
proved to be of such importance. We can imagine 
that an Egyptian country gentleman at the begin- 
ning of the Greek period might have tolerated the 
technical devices of his land surveyors, but would 
have felt that the airy generalizations of the specu- 
lative Greeks were tenuous, unpractical, waste of 
time. The obscurantists of all ages exhibit the same 
principles. All common sense is with them. Their 
only serious antagonist is History, and the history 
of Europe is dead against them. Abstract specu- 
lation has been the salvation of the world specu- 
lations which made systems and then transcended 
them, speculations which ventured to the furthest 
limit of abstraction. To set limits to speculation is 
treason to the future. 

But the weaving itself requires discipline. It has 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 61 

to be kept in some relation to the general facts of 
this epoch. Cosmology is the effort to frame a 
scheme of the general character of the present stage 
of the universe. The cosmological scheme should 
present the genus, for which the special schemes of 
the sciences are the species. The task of Cosmology 
is twofold. It restrains the aberrations of the mere 
undisciplined imagination. A special scheme should 
either fit in with the general cosmology, or should 
by its conformity to fact present reasons why the 
cosmology should be modified. In the case of such 
a misfit, the more probable result is some modifica- 
tion of the cosmology and some modification of 
the scheme in question. Thus the cosmology and 
the schemes of the sciences are mutually critics 
of each other. The limited morphology of a special 
science is confessedly incapable of expressing in 
its own categoreal notions all forms which are 
illustrated in the world. But it is the business of a 
cosmology to be adequate. For this reason a cos- 
mology must consider those factors which have 
not been adequately embraced in some science. It 
has also to include all the sciences. 

The dim recesses of experience present immense 
difficulties for analysis. The mere interrogation of 
immediate consciousness at one immediate moment 
tells us very little. Analytic power vanishes under 
such direct scrutiny. We have recourse to memory, 
to the testimony of others including their memories, 
to language in the form of the analysis of words 
arid phrases that is to say, to etymology and syn- 



62 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

tax. We should also consider the institutions of 
mankind in the light of an embodiment of their 
stable experience. 

In the search for categoreal notions sufficiently 
general to figure in a costfiological morphology, we 
must lay stress on those factors in experience which 
are "stable." By this it is meant that the discerning 
of them as illustrated in fact is not confined to a 
few special people, or a few special occasions. The 
illustration must rest on broad, widespread testi- 
mony. 

Here a distinction must be made. The first dis- 
cernment may be due to an exceptional man in an 
exceptional moment. But a secret which cannot be 
shared, must remain a secret. The categoreal forms 
should come to us with some evidence that they are 
widespread in experience. But we are now consider- 
ing the main difficulty of the speculative Reason, 
its confrontation with experience. 

There is a conventional view of experience, never 
admitted when explicitly challenged, but persist- 
ently lurking in the tacit presuppositions. This view 
conceives conscious experience as a clear-cut 
knowledge of clear-cut items with clear-cut con- 
nections with each other. This is the conception of 
a trim, tidy, finite experience uniformly illuminated. 
No notion could be further from the truth. In the 
first place the equating of experience with clarity 
of knowledge is against the evidence. In our own 
lives, and at any one moment, there is a focus of 
attention, a few items in clarity of awareness, but 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 63 

interconnected vaguely and yet insistently with 
other items in dim apprehension, and this dimness 
shading off imperceptibly into undiscriminated 
feeling. 

Further, the clarity cannot be segregated from 
the vagueness. The togetherness of the things that 
are clear refuses to yield its secret to clear analytic 
intuition. The whole forms a system, but when we 
set out to describe the system direct intuition plays 
us false. Our conscious awareness is fluctuating, 
flitting, and not under control. It lacks penetration. 
The penetration of intuition follows upon the ex- 
pectation of thought. This is the secret of attention. 

But besides this character of an immediate 
moment of experience, these moments differ among 
themselves in the life of any one of us. We are 
alert, or we are drowsy, or we are excited, or 
we are contemplative, or we are asleep, or we are 
dreaming, or we are intently expecting, or we are 
devoid of any concentrated expectation. Our 
variety of phases is infinite. 

Again when we consider other humans, and 
animals, an analogous variation suggests itself be- 
tween their average states, and between the highest 
stages respectively possible for different individuals. 
As we descend the scale, it seems that we find in 
the lower types a dim unconscious drowse, of un- 
discriminated feeling. For the lower types, experi- 
ence loses its illustration of forms, and its illumina- 
tion by consciousness, and its discrimination of pur- 
pose. It seems finally to end in a massive uncon- 



64 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

scious urge derived from undiscriminated feeling, 
this feeling being itself a derivation from the im- 
mediate past. 

The basis of all authority is the supremacy of 
fact over thought. Yet this contrast of fact and 
thought can be conceived fallaciously. For thought 
is a factor in the fact of experience. Thus the im- 
mediate fact is what it is, partly by reason of the 
thought involved in it. The quality of an act of ex- 
perience is largely determined by the factor of the 
thinking which it contains. But the thought involved 
in any one such act involves an analytic survey of 
experience beyond itself. The supremacy of fact 
over thought means that even the utmost flight of 
speculative thought should have its measure of 
truth. It may be the truth of art. But thought 
irrelevant to the wide world of experience, is un- 
productive. 

The proper satisfaction to be derived from specu- 
lative thought is elucidation. It is for this reason 
that fact is supreme over thought. This supremacy 
is the basis of authority. We scan the world to find 
evidence for this elucidatory power. 

Thus the supreme verification of the speculative 
flight is that it issues in the establishment of a 
practical technique for well-attested ends, and that 
the speculative system maintains itself as the eluci- 
dation of that technique. In this way there is the 
progress from thought to practice, and regress from 
practice to the same thought. This interplay of 
thought and practice is the supreme authority. It 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 65 

is the test by which the charlatanism of speculation 
is restrained. 

In human history, a practical technique embodies 
itself in established institutions professional as- 
sociations, scientific associations, business associ- 
ations, universities, churches, governments. Thus 
the study of the ideas which underlie the sociological 
structure is an appeal to the supreme authority. 
It is the Stoic appeal to the "voice of nature." 

But even this supreme authority fails to be final, 
and this for two reasons. In the first place the evi- 
dence is confused, ambiguous, and contradictoiy. 
In the second place, if at any period of human 
history it had been accepted as final, all progress 
would have been stopped. The horrid practices of 
the past, brutish and nasty, would have been fast- 
ened upon us for all ages. Nor can we accept the 
present age as our final standard. We can live, and 
we can live well. But we feel the urge of the trend 
upwards : we still look toward the better life. 

We have to seek for a discipline of the specu- 
lative Reason. It is of the essence of such specu- 
lation that it transcends immediate fact. Its business 
is to make thought creative of the future. It effects 
this by its vision of systems of ideas, including ob- 
servation but generalized beyond it. The need of 
discipline arises because the history of speculation 
is analogous to the history of practice. If we survey 
mankind, their speculations have been foolish, 
brutish, and nasty. The true use of history is that 
we extract from it general principles as to the 



66 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

discipline of practice and the discipline of specu- 
lation. 

The object of this discipline is not stability but 
progress. It has been urged in these pages, that 
there is no true stability. What looks like stability 
is a relatively slow process of atrophied decay. The 
stable universe is slipping away from under us. Our 
aim is upwards. 

The men who made speculation effective were the 
Greek thinkers. We owe to them the progressive 
European civilization. It is therefore common sense 
to observe the methods which they introduced into 
the conduct of thought. 

In the first place, they were unboundedly curi- 
ous. They probed into everything, questioned every- 
thing, and sought to understand everything. This 
is merely to say that they were speculative to a 
superlative degree. In the second place, they were 
rigidly systematic both in their aim at clear defini- 
tion and at logical consistency. In fact, they in- 
vented logic in order to be consistent. Thirdly, they 
were omnivorous in their interests natural science, 
ethics, mathematics, political philosophy, meta- 
physics, theology, esthetics, and all alike attracted 
their curiosity. Nor did they keep these subjects 
rigidly apart. They very deliberately strove to com- 
bine them into one coherent system of ideas. 
Fourthly, they sought truths of the highest gen- 
erality. Also in seeking these truths, they paid 
attention to the whole body of their varied interests. 
Fifthly, they were men with active practical interests. 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 67 

Plato went to Sicily in order to assist in a political 
experiment, and throughout his life studied mathe- 
matics. In those days mathematics and its applica- 
tions were not so separated as they can be today. 
No doubt, the sort of facts that he observed were 
the applications of mathematical theory. But no 
one had a keener appreciation than Plato of the 
divergence between the exactness of abstract 
thought and the vague margin of ambiguity which 
haunts all observation. Indeed in this respect Plato, 
the abstract thinker, far surpasses John Stuart 
Mill, the inductive philosopher. Mill in his account 
of the inductive methods of science never faces the 
difficulty that no observation ever does exactly 
verify the law which it is presumed to support. 
Plato's feeling for the inexactness of physical ex- 
perience in contrast to the exactness of thought 
certainly suggests that he could look for himself. 
Mill's determinism is, according to his own theory, 
an induction respecting the exactness of conforma- 
tion to the conditions set by antecedent circum- 
stances. But no one has ever had any such 
experience of exact conformation. No observational 
basis whatsoever can ever be obtained for the support 
of Mill's doctrine. Plato knew this primary fact 
about experience, Mill did not. Determinism may be 
the true doctrine, but it can never be proved by the 
methods prescribed by English empiricism. 

When we come to Aristotle the enumeration of 
his practical activities makes us wonder that he had 
any time for thought at all. He analyzed the consti- 



68 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

tutions of the leading Greek states, he dissected the 
great dramatic literature of his age, he dissected 
fishes, he dissected sentences and arguments, he 
taught the youthful Alexander. A man, who had 
done these things and others, might well have been 
excused if he had pleaded lack of time for mere ab- 
stract thought. 

In considering the culmination of Greek specula- 
tion in Plato and Aristotle the characteristics which 
finally stand out are the universality of their inter- 
ests, the systematic exactness at which they aimed, 
and the generality of their thoughts. It is no rash 
induction to conclude that these combined char- 
acteristics constitute one main preservative of spec- 
ulation from follv. 

V 

The speculative Reason works in two ways so as 
to submit itself to the authority of facts without loss 
of its mission to transcend the existing analysis of 
facts. In one way it accepts the limitations of a 
special topic, such as a science or a practical method- 
ology. It then seeks speculatively to enlarge and 
recast the categoreal ideas within the limits of that 
topic. This is speculative Reason in its closest alli- 
ance with the methodological Reason. 

In the other way, it seeks to build a cosmology 
expressing the general nature of the world as dis- 
closed in human interests. It has already been 
pointed out, that in order to keep such a cosmology 
in contact with reality account must be taken of the 
welter of established institutions constituting the 
structures of human society throughout the ages. 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 69 

It is only in this way that we can appeal to the 
widespread effective elements in the experience of 
mankind. What those institutions stood for in the 
experience of their contemporaries, represents the 
massive facts of ultimate authority. 

The discordance at once disclosed among the be- 
liefs and purposes of men is commonplace. But in 
a way, the task is simplified. The superficial details 
at once disclose themselves by the discordance which 
they disclose. The concordance in general notions 
stands out. The very fact of institutions to effect 
purposes witnesses to unquestioned belief that fore- 
sight and purpose can shape the attainment of ends. 
The discordance over moral codes witnesses to the 
fact of moral experience. You cannot quarrel about 
unknown elements. The basis of every discord is 
some common experience, discordantly realized. 

A cosmology should above all things be adequate. 
It should not confine itself to the categoreal notions 
of one science, and explain away everything which 
will not fit in. Its business is not to refuse experi- 
ence but to find the most general interpretive 
system. Also it is not a mere juxtaposition of the 
various categoreal notions of the various sciences. 
It generalizes beyond any special science, and thus 
provides the interpretive system which expresses 
their interconnection. Cosmology, since it is the 
outcome of the highest generality of speculation, is 
the critic of all speculation inferior to itself in gen- 
erality. 

But cosmology shares the imperfections of all the 



7U THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

efforts of finite intelligence. The special sciences fall 
short of their aim, and cosmology equally fails. 
Thus when the novel speculation is produced a 
threefold problem is set. Some special science, the 
cosmological scheme, and the novel concept will 
have points of agreement and points of variance. 
Reason intervenes in the capacity of arbiter and yet 
with a further exercise of speculation. The science is 
modified, the cosmological outlook is modified, and 
the novel concept is modified. The joint discipline 
has eliminated elements of folly, or of mere 
omission, from all three. The purposes of mankind 
receive the consequential modification, and the 
shock is transmitted through the whole sociological 
structure of technical methods and of institutions. 

Every construction of human intelligence is more 
special, more limited than was its original aim. Cos- 
mology sets out to be the general system of general 
ideas applicable to this epoch of the universe. Ab- 
straction is to be made from all subordinate details. 
Thus there should be one cosmology presiding over 
many sciences. Unfortunately this ideal has not 
been realized. The cosmological outlooks of differ- 
ent schools of philosophy differ. They do more than 
differ, they are largely inconsistent with each other. 
The discredit of philosophy has largely arisen from 
this warring of the schools. 

So long as the dogmatic fallacy infests the world, 
this discordance will continue to be misinterpreted. 
If philosophy be erected upon clear and distinct 
ideas, then the discord of philosophers, competent 



THE FUNCTION OF REASON 71 

and sincere men, implies that they are pursuing a 
will-o'-the-wisp. But as soon as the true function of 
rationalism is understood, that it is a gradual ap- 
proach to ideas of clarity and generality, the discord 
is what may be expected. 

The various cosmologies have in various degrees 
failed to achieve the generality and the clarity at 
which they aim. They are inadequate, vague, and 
push special notions beyond the proper limits of 
their application. For example, Descartes is ob- 
viously right, in some sense or other, when he says 
that we have bodies and that we have minds, and 
that they can be studied in some disconnection. It 
is what we do daily in practical life. This philosophy 
makes a large generalization which obviously has 
some important validity. But if you turn it into a 
final cosmology, errors will creep in. The same is 
true of other schools of philosophy. They all say 
something which is importantly true. Some types of 
philosophy have produced more penetrating cos- 
mologies than other schools. At certain epochs a 
cosmology may be produced which includes its 
predecessors and assigns to them their scope of 
validity. But at length, that cosmology will be 
found out. Rivals will appear correcting it, and per- 
haps failing to include some of its general truths. 

In this way mankind stumbles on in its task of 
understanding the world. 

In conclusion we must recur to our initial ques- 
tion, which is the title of this discussion, The Func- 
tion of Reason. If we survey the world as a physical 



72 THE FUNCTION OF REASON 

system determined by its antecedent states, it pre- 
sents to us the spectacle of a finite system steadily 
running down losing its activities and its varieties. 
The various evolutionary formulae give no hint of 
any contrary tendency. The struggle for existence 
gives no hint why more complex, delicate organisms 
should arise. In the same way, earthquakes give no 
hint as to why there should be cities. Again the 
crowding of houses is no explanation why houses 
should be beautiful. But there is in nature some 
tendency upwards, in a contrary direction to the 
aspect of physical decay. In our experience we find 
appetition, effecting a final causation towards ideal 
ends which lie outside the mere physical tendency, 
In the burning desert there is appetition towards 
water, whereas the physical tendency is towards in- 
creased dryness of the animal body. The appetition 
towards esthetic satisfaction by some enjoyment of 
beauty is equally outside the mere physical order. 

But mere blind appetition would be the product 
of chance and could lead nowhere. In our experi- 
ence, we find Reason and speculative imagination. 
There is a discrimination of appetitions according 
to a rule of fitness. This reign of Reason is vacillat- 
ing, vague, and dim. But it is there. 

We have thus some knowledge, in a form special- 
ized to the special aptitudes of human beings, we 
have some knowledge of that counter-tendency 
which converts the decay of one order into the birth 
of its successor. 



